California, session 20252026, AB1670.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14132.24 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14132.24. (a) A provider shall be paid additional compensation when Behavior management, when a patient’s physical, behavioral, developmental, or emotional condition requires significant extra time, attention, or personnel to safely deliver dental care. care, is a covered benefit, subject to utilization controls.Additional compensation shall be paid pursuant to this section no more than three times in a 12-month period. A fourth bill for additional compensation under this section shall accompany another dental procedure.(b)The department shall create an aid code to identify whether the beneficiary is also served by a regional center.(b) Desensitization services without an accompanying dental procedure, when a patient’s physical, behavioral, developmental, or emotional condition requires such services preceding a dental visit in order to safely deliver dental care, is a covered benefit, subject to utilization controls.(c) (1) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized, and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions.